Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1635.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1701.1 of Title 69, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Oklahoma Turnpike Authority shall develop and submit a


comprehensive plan for its orderly dissolution and disbandment. The


plan shall include, at a minimum, provisions for the:


1. Liquidation of assets;


2. Transfer of all turnpike infrastructure and road inventory


to the Department of Transportation;





Req. No. 3107 Page 1


3. Application of any surplus funds toward the retirement of


outstanding debts, prioritizing obligations with the highest


interest rates; and


4. A detailed cost-benefit analysis of such proposed


dissolution, including fiscal impacts to the state and ratepayers.


B. 1. The Authority shall electronically submit the completed


plan to the Legislature and the Governor no later than December 31,


2027.


2. Upon failure of the Authority to submit such plan by the


required date, or if such plan is deemed incomplete or inadequate by


joint resolution of the Legislature, the Authority shall be


prohibited from issuing any new bonds, increasing toll rates, or


initiating new construction projects until the plan is submitted or


is deemed complete by joint resolution of the Legislature.


3. In addition to such prohibitions provided for in paragraph 2


of this subsection, the Authority shall be subject to a civil


penalty of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per day for each day


until such plan is submitted or is deemed complete by joint


resolution of the Legislature. The Attorney General is authorized


to enforce the provisions of this paragraph through civil action.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby



Req. No. 3107 Page 2


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3107 MSBB 1/13/2026 5:25:53 PM









































Req. No. 3107 Page 3